apertium-en.en.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>

<alphabet>AÀBCDEÈFGHIÌJKLMNÑOÒPQRSTUÙVWXYZaàbcdeèfghiìjklmnñoòpqrstuùvwxyz</alphabet>

<sdefs>
   <sdef n="n"/>
   <sdef n="sg"/>
   <sdef n="pl"/>
   <sdef n="vb"/>
   <sdef n="adj"/>
   <sdef n="prep"/>
<<<<<<< HEAD
   <sdef n="pri"/>
   <sdef n="inf"/>
=======
>>>>>>> 60c8f9723616dd5d542bbbf8bf1544d41bf184c5
   <sdef n="p1"/>
   <sdef n="p2"/>
   <sdef n="p3"/>
</sdefs>

<pardefs>
        <pardef n="gramophone__n">
                <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
                <e><p><l>s</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        </pardef>

	<pardef n="bus__n">
                <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
                <e><p><l>es</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        </pardef>

	<pardef n="on__prep">
                <e><p><l/><r><s n="prep"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

        <pardef n="travel/__vb">
	   <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vb"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
           <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vb"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
           <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vb"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
           <e><p><l>s</l><r><s n="vb"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
           <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vb"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
           <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vb"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
           <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vb"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        </pardef>
	
	

</pardefs>

<section id="main" type="standard">
        <e lm="gramophone"><i>gramophone</i><par n="gramophone__n"/></e>
	<e lm="bus"><i>bus</i><par n="bus__n"/></e>
	<e lm="travel"><i>travel</i><par n="travel/__vb"/></e>
	<e lm="mile"><i>mile</i><par n="gramophone__n"/></e>
        <e lm="termometer"><i>thermometer</i><par n="gramophone__n"/></e>
        <e lm="two"><i>two</i><par n="gramophone__n"/></e>
        <e lm="thousand"><i>thousand</i><par n="gramophone__n"/></e>
	<e lm="on"><i>on</i><par n="on__prep"/></e>
	<e lm="to"><i>to</i><par n="on__prep"/></e>	
	<e lm="with"><i>with</i><par n="on__prep"/></e>
	<e lm="hang-out"><i>hang-out</i><par n="on__prep"/></e>

</section>

</dictionary>
